Utah statutes.
10-6-120.   Property tax levy -- Amount in budget as basis for determining.
From the effective date of the budget or of any amendment enacted prior to the
date on which property taxes are levied, the amount stated therein as the
amount of estimated revenue from property taxes shall constitute the basis for
determining the property tax levy to be set by the governing body for the
corresponding tax year, subject to the applicable limitations imposed by law.
